Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Chapter 88. Real Estate Brokers and Other Licensees.

Administrative Code. —

For real estate commission, see 12 AAC 64.

Collateral references. —

Rohan, Goldstein and Bobis, Real Estate Brokerage Law and Practice (Matthew Bender).

12 Am. Jur. 2d, Brokers, §§ 6-36.

12 C.J.S., Brokers, §§ 14-24.

Necessity of having real estate broker’s license in order to recover commission as affected by fact that business sold includes real property, 82 ALR3d 1139.